2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-ga.pat.txt
reast5a
rea3t??
re??3ir
reic5t6
reo3d??
reo5ite.
reo1m
r??5adh
r??al5a
r??al2t
r??5ann.
r6??as
r??5ife
r??ig3
r??5ig??
r??i5m??r
r6??ith
r1f
rf5eol
rga5d??
r3g4as
r4gd
r3gead
rg5eam
rg5ean4
rg3eas
r4g3??
r1gh6
rghair5
rghin5
r2gi
r3gint
r2g??
r4g1l
r5g??it
r5g??t
r1gr
r4g3ru
r4gs
r3g??
r3ha
riach3
riacht4
rias4t5
4riat
ribh6i
ri3ch4
ridh4
rid3i
4righn
ri5gin
4rih
ri5lei
rin2
rinc1
ri3n??
rins3i??
rint3??
rion2t3
rios3t4
rip4te
rir4
ri5r??
ris3c4??
ris1t4
ri3ta
ri3t??
rit5??a
rit5??ir
ri5tr
r??bh3
r??2c
r??6ch5e
r??5ch??
r??3ocht
r??o5mhar
r??r2
r??6the
r??6thi
r1l
rla5m6??n
rleat6
rl??5ama
rl??5an
rl??5ig??
rl??5imi
r4lg
rlin6
r1m2ad
r5m6ain
rm6air
rm3al
r3man
r2me
r3measc
r1mh6
r4mig
rm4il
r4mim
r5m6isi
r4mit
r2mi??
r2m??
r4ml
r4mo
r3m??s
r4ms
r4m3u
rm3??
r3n4aca
r3n4ap
r3n??d
r3n??s
r6n5eam
rn5e??ilt
rn3e??l
r4ne??lf
rn5eoire
r4nf
rn3g
rn2i
r6n5ia
rn5id
rn3i??
rn4??ne
rn6??ni
r3no
rn1??
r5n6??in.
r5n6??n
rn3??
ro4c
rof5
roi4
4roid
roim3??
2ro??
r4ol
rom4p3a
rost3ac
rost5al
rost3??
rost6??r
r??b4
4r??c
r??6f
r??i6
r??ist5
4r??it
r??5l6an
4r??m
r??mh5ai
r??mh5ar
r??s6t??
r??t1
r??t5a
r5pa.
r5pa??
rp3ar
r3p??n
r4p3e
r4p3i
r6p5??g.
r5p??ga
rp1r
r2r1
rra3ch??
rra3l
rran4
rrbh4
rrc4
rr5d
rrt4
r1s2
rs6ain
r5san
rs6??in
r5s6??n
rsc2??
r2scn
r6s3ead
r4sf
rshlua5
rs3im
rt1a
rt4ag??
r5t6ail
rt6ain??
r3tair.
rt5a??o
r3t4al
r3tana
r1tar
rt6as??
rt1??
r5t??.
r4tc
r2te
rt3eac
rt5eag
rt3eam
rt3ean
r3t4ear
r3t4e??.
r1th2
rtha3t
rth??ad6
rth??5id
rth??5ig??
rth??5imi
rth??5itea
rth??5it??
r2t1i
r3t4il
rti3s4
r2t??
r4t5l
r4to
rt1??
rt1r
r6ts
rt3u
rt3??c
r3t??i
rt5??il
r6t5??l
r5t??m
r1t??n
rua5b
ruad6
rua3da
ruai6
rua3imi
rua5itear
ruch3t4??
r4ud
rusc3a
rus3c4??
rus4t5
r??ch6t5
4r??d
r??3d4ar.
r??3id??
r??1im
r5??ine
r??3inn
r??3itea
r??5it??.
r1??l
r??3mar
r??st3a
r3wi
s1a
sa3b??
sa5c6as
sa3d??
sa3f??
sa5fr
sa3g4??
saigh6d5
sail5b
sain6t5e
sair5d6
s6ais??
saist3e
sa3l4ain
sa3lan
sal5at
5sal??m
salt3
s6a5mat
s2amh
s6ams
3s4an.
san2??
sant4
5s6ao.
sar3b
sar5c
s4arl
sa3r4??
s6at.
sat5a
sa5t??
sat5ra
s6ats
s1??
s6??ili
s??5inn.
s??in6t
s??5ite.
s??5ite??.
s1b
sb6a
sbh6
sbheir5
6sc.
sca6b
scach6
sca5ch??
s3c4ae
s3c4aird
sc6ao
sc3ar3n4
s5cat
sc??in5t
s3cear
sc1eo
s3c4eog
s5c6eoig
sc4??im
s1ch4
3scia
s6cig
sc1im
3scior
sc3it
sc3i??il
2sc1??
s6c??.
sc1n
scoir5
s4cor
scor3b4
s3c??.
s6c??i
3sc??ip
s3c??l
1sc??p
s3c??s
sc3ra??
s1cr??
scr??ach5
scr??acht6
1scr??
sc1r??
sc3um4
sc3??c
s3c??n
s1d
seach6t5a
6seag
s5eag??
5seai
seal5a
seal6b
sealbh5
sealt6
seana6
seanad5
sean5m
s5eanna.
seas5t
s4eat
5se??ib
s6eic
seic6t
seift5
seil6f
seir4f3
seit5s
6seo.
seod3
s??alt6
s??ar3
s??ir4s5
s1f
s3fe
3s4f??a
3s4f??ir
sfhear5
s3fi
s1g
sghair5t
1sh2
shaigh6d5
shail5b
shair5d6
shant6
shar5
sh??5ite.
sh??5ite??.
sh??5it??
sheach6t5a
sheal5a
shean5m
shearbh5
sheas5t
sheic4t
sheil6f
sheir6f3
sheit5s
sh??a5l6ain
sh??ir6s
shib5??
ship5
shi??n4
shi??nt3
sh??5bh
sh??6l5
sh??4o
sh??6t
shlios5
shl??od5
shn??5d
shn??5g
shn??5m
shn??5od
shn??5oma
shn??5on
shnua5
sho5chaid
sho5gh
sho3mh6
shor4
shorb5
sho5th
sh??5f
sh??5id??
sh??5im
sh??5inn
sh??5it??
sh??5mh
shua6i
shua3l6
sh??5c
sh??ch6
sh??5d6ar
sh??5im.
sh??5in
sh??5it??.
sh??5mar
sh??s5
s1ia
siach6
siacht5
sia5it
si5be
sib5??
s1ic
s1id
sidh6
6sif
si3f4??
s5i5fr
s1ig
si5g6??
s6ilea
s4ilf
s6ilig??
s4ilt
s1im
simea5
s4im??
5s6ing
sin6??
s4int
sint5i??
sios5t6
sis3
sis6c
sist4
s1i??
6si??d
5s6i??it
si??r5
5si??t
s??3bh
s??l3
3s4??le
s5??mea
s??ol5
s??oll6
s??4th5
s1l
sla4
slac5??
slag3??
slag3??
s4l??in
s6l??n
sle??5d6
sl??ach6
sl??acht5
sl??od5??
sl??6t
s1m2
sma5la
smeach5
smeacht6
smead5
smear5
smeart6
sme??6
smh4
sm6i
s1n2
snit4
s3n??
snua5
sobh6
so5chaid
soch6t5
sod3
sof3a
so5gh
soir6bh
so5l??i
so3mh4
so5nu
sorb5
sor4c
sorch5
so5th6
s1??f
s1??g
s??in4
3s4??in.
s6??ine
s6??in??
s??5it??
s??5l6ain
s??5l6an
s??5mh
3s4??n
s??5tac
s??5t6a??
s1p
spad5a
spad5??
spair4n5
s6p5ann
speach5
spi6d
spor5
sport6
sp??r6
sprae5
spuir6
s1r
sr6??
6st.
sta5d??
s1tag
stai6
st3aig
staist5
st1a??
s1tal
st5ama
st3as
st??in6
5st??it
5st??t3
st5eann
4steo
s1t??
3st??ig
s4t??in
6sti.
s3tice
s5ticig
s5tile.
st1im
s6tio
s3t4ir
st6ise
st3ith
s3t4??c
s3t4??s
s3t??g
s1tr
strae5
s4trala
st6u
s3t6??in
sua6i
sua3l4
s??5c
s??ch6
s6??d
s??5d6ar
s4??f
s6??ig
s??5im.
s??5inn
s4??it
s??5ite.
s??5it??.
s??5mar
s1??n
s??s5
sv4a
ta4cha
tach6t??
ta3cr
ta5d??i
t3adh.
tae5n
3t4aga
ta3g4??
tag5??5l
tagh4
taghd3
ta1g??
5t6aig.
5t6aige
3t4ainia
tain4t3
tair2b
tairbh3
tair6g3
tair2n3
taisc5e
tais5tear
tais5te??
taist5il
tais5t??
tai3t??
t5ait??
ta4l5a
tal6c5
t4all
6t5a5l6??in
6tal??n
tam4al
ta5m6??i
ta3m??n
5tanb
tan3g??
t3ann
4tanna.
t6annac
t6annai
ta5no
tan4t3
ta5p6l
t2ar
tar1c2
tar5d6
tar3g4
tart4a
tar5ta.
ta3s4l
ta3s4t
tas5tr
3t4at
5tata
4ta3to
tat5??
3t??.
t??6d5
t1??il
t??6im.
t??ir4s3
t??ir5t
t6??it
t3??iv
2t1??l
3t4??s
t6??t
t??5th6ar
t1b
tbh6
t1c
t3dh
3teab
t3ead
tea5fa
tea3g4??
tea3gr
t3eal.
t3eala
tea5lain
tea3lan
t3eal??
t5ealt
tea3m4??
t4eamo
5tean??
t2ear
t3ear3n4
teas2t5
te??6
t1e??i
t1e??l
te??m5
1tei
t1eo
5t4eoc
t??ach6
t??acht5
t??al2
t??a3la
t??ar5t6
4t??ig
t??6igh
4t3??irs
t4??it
2t1f
t1g
t2h
4th.
t6ha
6thab
thach6t5
thagh4
thaghd3
thair4b
thairbh5
thair6g
thair6is.
thair4n
thairn5e
thaist5
th5am.
than3g
than2t3
tha6p5
tharc6
thar5g6
thar3n4
5tharr
thar5t6a
th??in5
th??ir5t
t4he
thead5as
thea3la
theas4t5
6the??
th5e??n
t6h??
th??ach6
th??acht5
th??al2
th??a3la
th??3if
th1f
th5in.
thin6i
thit3e
th??6f5
th??o5t
th6??s
th1l
thlua5da
th5n??
5thoin6
thoir4n3
3thon
thor4c
thor5p??
thost5
th??ch5
5th??gt
th??ir6se
th??ir6s??
th??s4
thr??5b
thr??5inn
thr??3oc
thros6
4ths
thua5da
thua5im
thua5itea
thuar5
5thuig
3thur
thu5sa
6ti.
tia5g
6t5iam
t1ib2
tib5??
tib6??ar
ti1bi
t1id4
ti3d??
ti3di
ti3f4
t1ig
5t6ige
t3ileo
t3il??
4til??t
t5ilt
4t3i1m4??
ti5m??ne
ti5m??ni
tin6d5
t3inea
t3ini
t3in??
tin5t4
tipi5c6
tir4i
tis3
t3ist6
tit5ea
tit5e??
6t5iteo
ti5t??
ti3ti??
t1i??.
t3i??l
3ti??n
t1??
t??4f3
t??g5
3t2??l1
5t6??ol
5t??op
5t??or
t??o5t6
3t4??p
5t??r
6t5??teas
6t5??ti
2t1l
t1m
tm4a
tm6e
tm6i
2t1n2
t5ne
t5n??
tod5??
tof5
6toid
toin6
toir2n3
tom6a
tor2c
torch3
tor3p
tort5a
tos6t3
t??ch5
t1??f
3t??ip
t??ir6se
t??ir6s??
3t??l
3t??p
1t??s4
tra6b??
trac6
6tra5c??
trai6m5
4traip
6tral??ib
t3rar
tr??5b
tr??5inn
t6r??is
t4r??t
tream4
trea3ma
triach6
tri3ghn
tr??1r
tros6
trost5
3tr??p
t4ru
truac4
trua3c??
tr6??
t6r??s
ts2
t5sa
t6sai
tsa6l
tsal5a
tsal6v5
t1s4ea
t6sean
tsearbh5
t3seo
t3si
tsi6m5
tsi??n6
tsi??nt5
t1s??
t3su
t3s??
tua5da
tua5itea
tuar5
tuis3
tu??o3
tur3b
tur3n4
t5??id
t??3m6
3t??s3
t3vi
uabh6r
ua3chl
uad3??
ua1f2
ua6fa.
6uaid
ua3id??
uai5g6??
ua3ig??.
ua3imid
ua3imis
ua3inn.
uains6
uain5t4
uair3c4??
uairn6
uair5t??
uais1
uaist2
ua3ite??
uaith6i5s
ua3it??.
uait5s
uala5t
ualath6
ual3g4
ua3lu
ua3mar
uamh6ar
ua3mh??
uana5l6
5uanla
ua5n??s
uar3g4
uart4
uar5tai
uar5ta??.
uar5tan
ub1a
ub5??
ubh1
uc1a
uch1a
uch3??
uch3??
uch3r
uc5l
uc3r
uc3s
uc5??
ud1
uf1
uga5d??
ug3l
uic6i5s
uid1
uif??5
6uig3
uil3p
ui4m
uim3p
uin5c
uins3i??
uin3t4
uint5??
uin6t??n
ui6p5
uir5b4
uirbh6
uir3c4??
4uire
uirn6
6uirs
uirs3t
uir3t
uirt4??
ui6s
uis3cr
uis5t
uit3??
uit3s
u??3b
u??3d
u??1g
u??5l6e
u??1m
u??1od
u??o3d??
u??3oma
u??3onn
u??3??
u??5te??
u??th6
u??5t??
ul1a
ul3??
ul3g4
ul3m4
ul3??
ul5p6
ul6t5as
ul4tr
um1a
umh1
ump1
un5a
un3??
unc1a
un5e
ung1
un5ga3l
un3g4ar
un5g??
un3o
un1??
un6sa.
un6s5a??
un3??
un??d4
u??3t6
up1
4ur1a
urach3
ur6ag
ur3??
urca3m4
urch4
ur3d6??
urg5??i
ur5g??n
ur3i
ur6l3??l
ur3m4
6urn
ur3??
ur3p
urscar6
urscart5
ur3t4
ur5u
ur3??
6us.
usc5ai
usc3l
us3cr
ust5ac
ust5ail
us4t3al
us3t??
us5tu
ust5??n
ut5a
u6t5??
ut3e
uth1
uthan5t
ut3??
uz3a
??5an
??1??
??4??il.
??b1
??ba5d??
??bail4
??b4h
??bh5a
??c1a
??ca3b
??cas4t
??ch1a
??1ch2??
??3che
??3ch??
??ch5l
??ch5??g
??5chr
??cht4??
??c1l
??c1??
??c1r
??c4r??
??d1
??6d??
??d5r
??d5??
??1f
??6f??
??1gh
??g1r
4??id
??3id??s
??3ig??
6??ile
6??ili
??il4t3
??3imi
??int4
??irt3
??ir2t??
??isc3
??is3c4??
??5itear
??3ite??.
??ithi5s
??6it??n
??its3e??
??l1
??3l4ag
??4l5ag??
??lc4
??5l6e
??l6??im
??3l4i
6??lr
??lt4
??3l4ua
??l5??
??l??5l
??1mh
??mh3ac
??4mhn
??4mh3??
??n5a
??n3??
??ng5??
??ng5u
6??nl
4??1nn
??n3o
??n1??
??n3t2
??p1
??6p5a
??pa5t6
??5p6r
??r1
??ra3b
??rabh4
??ra3d??
??ran6
??r6ana
??r5??
??rt4
??3r6u
??r4??
??5r??i
??s4air
??s2??
??s5??n
??sc1
??4sh3l
??3s4m
??s3??
??3s4p??
??3sto
??st3??
??s6t3r
??s3??
??t3a
??6t1??
??th1
??3tho
??t5??g
??t1r
??5??i
??5??l
v1a
vach6
vac3s4
v4ad
vais5
vaisc6
var5
vard6
3v4at
v1??
vean6
veant5
vear3
vearn6
3v4ei
veil5b
v3eo
v??ar6
v??is5
v??ist6
5v6ial
3v4ini
vios5
vir5
virg6
v6??c
v3la
3vol4
volt3
vu??t5
x3ac
x5ai
x5a??
